Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 4
OFFICERS AND ELECTIONS

7-56-401. Directors - elections - remuneration - vacancy.

The affairs of a cooperative formed under or subject to this article shall be managed by a board of not less than three directors as provided in the articles or bylaws elected by and from the members of the cooperative or designated representatives of members who are not individuals. If authorized by the articles or the bylaws, up to twenty percent of the board may consist of directors who are neither members nor representatives of members. Directors who are not members of the cooperative or representatives of members may be elected by a vote of two-thirds of the cooperative members present and voting. Nominations for the position of director shall be conducted in a manner provided in the bylaws or in a resolution of the board or of the members.

The articles or bylaws may provide that the territory in which the cooperative has members shall be divided into districts and that the directors shall be elected according to such districts, either directly or by district delegates elected by the members in that district. In that case the articles or bylaws shall state the number of directors to be elected by each district and the manner and method of reapportioning the directors and of redistricting the territory covered by the cooperative. The bylaws may provide that primary elections shall be held in each district to elect the directors apportioned to such districts and that the result of all such primary elections shall be ratified at the next regular meeting of the cooperative or be considered final as to the cooperative.

A cooperative may provide a reasonable remuneration for the time actually spent by its officers and directors in its service. No director, during the term of the director's office, shall be a party to a contract for profit with the cooperative differing in any way from the business relations accorded members of the cooperative.

The articles or bylaws may limit directors from occupying any position in the cooperative on a regular salary or substantially full-time pay. The articles or bylaws may provide for an executive committee and may allot to the committee all the functions and powers of the board, subject to the general direction and control of the board.

When a vacancy on the board occurs other than by expiration of term, the remaining members of the board, even though not a quorum, by a majority vote, shall fill the unexpired term, unless the articles or bylaws provide for an election of directors by district, in which event, unless the articles or bylaws provide for a different procedure, the board shall immediately call a special meeting of the members in the district to fill the vacancy.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 501, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 2226, § 83, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1413, § 46, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-113 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-402. Officers - titles - election - duties and authority - removal.

The bylaws shall provide for one or more officers and the titles of those officers. The offices may include a board chair, one or more vice-chairs, a president, one or more vice-presidents, a secretary, a treasurer, and assistant officers or other officers. The officers shall be elected by the board or in any other manner prescribed in the bylaws. At least one officer shall be an individual at least eighteen years of age. At least one officer shall be a member of the board. One individual may simultaneously hold more than one office, but may not concurrently hold the offices of president and secretary.

The bylaws or board of each cooperative shall designate one or more officers responsible for preparing and maintaining the minutes of board and membership meetings and all records required to be kept by section 7-56-107 and for authenticating records.

All officers and agents of the cooperative, as between themselves and the cooperative, shall have such authority and perform such duties in the management of the cooperative as may be provided in the bylaws, or as may be determined by resolution of the board of directors not inconsistent with federal, state, and local law, the articles, and the bylaws.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, the board may remove any officer at any time with or without cause.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 502, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1413, § 47, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-114 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-403. Procedures for meetings of the board of directors.

The board shall meet at least annually. The board may establish a time and place for regular board meetings and then may hold regular board meetings at such times without notice.

Special meetings of the board shall require at least two days' notice of the date, time, and place. Unless otherwise provided by the articles or bylaws, purposes of a special meeting do not have to be stated in the notice of any special meeting.

A director's attendance at a special meeting constitutes waiver of the notice requirement for that meeting unless the director objects to the lack of or method of notice and does not thereafter participate in the meeting or if notice of the purpose of the meeting was required but not given and the director objects to the transaction of business for that purpose and does not thereafter participate in the meeting with respect to that purpose.

A director is considered to have assented to an action of the board unless:

The director votes against it or abstains and causes the abstention to be recorded in the minutes of the meeting;

The director objects at the beginning of the meeting and does not vote for it later;

The director causes the director's dissent to be recorded in the minutes;

The director does not attend the meeting at which the vote is taken; or

The director gives notice of the director's objection in writing to the secretary within twenty-four hours after the meeting.

Unless otherwise provided by the articles or bylaws:

The board may permit any or all directors to participate in a regular or special meeting through the use of any means of communication by which all directors participating are able to communicate simultaneously with each other during the meeting;

Actions of the board may be taken without a meeting if the action is agreed to by all members of the board and is evidenced by one or more written consents together signed by all directors and filed with the corporate records reflecting the action taken;

Purposes of a special meeting do not have to be stated in the notice of any special meeting, but at least two days' notice of the date, time, and place shall be given.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 502, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(4)(c) and (4)(e) amended, p. 1413, § 48, effective July 1.

7-56-404. Removal of director by the membership or the board.

At a meeting called expressly for that purpose, as well as any other proper purpose, a director may be removed by the members in the manner provided in this section upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the members present and voting in person or in any other manner authorized by the cooperative pursuant to section 7-56-305 (1) or, if removal of a director is by the board, then by a majority of the members of the board not subject to removal.

The board may remove a director who does not meet the qualifications for board membership stated in the articles and bylaws of the cooperative.

The members may remove one or more directors only for cause unless the articles or bylaws allow directors to be removed without cause.

Removal of directors by the vote of the members shall be initiated by written petition signed by at least ten percent of the members stating the alleged causes or reasons for removing the director. No petition shall seek removal of more than one director.

Within ninety days after receipt of a petition meeting the requirements of subsection (4) of this section, the board shall schedule the removal vote at a regular or special meeting of the membership upon determination by the board, if necessary, that cause has been stated. Any determination of cause shall be made by a majority of the directors not subject to removal petitions. If more than a majority of the board is subject to removal petitions, then the matter shall be promptly referred to an attorney who has been duly licensed to practice law in Colorado for at least five years and who has not previously represented the cooperative. The attorney's determination of whether cause has been stated shall be final for the purpose of whether to schedule a vote on removal.

Any director subject to a removal petition under any provision of this section shall be promptly informed in writing by the board and shall have the opportunity, in person and by counsel, to be heard and present evidence at the meeting called for the vote. The persons seeking removal shall have the same opportunity.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 503, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2227, § 84, effective July 1, 2004.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-117 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-405. Removal of director by judicial proceeding.

A director may be removed by the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the cooperative's principal office is located or, if the cooperative has no principal office in this state, by the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located or, if the cooperative has no registered agent, by the district court for the city and county of Denver, in a proceeding commenced either by the cooperative or by at least ten percent of the members, if the court finds that the director engaged in fraudulent or dishonest conduct or gross abuse of authority or discretion with respect to the cooperative, and that removal is in the best interests of the cooperative.

If the members commence a proceeding under subsection (1) of this section, they shall make the cooperative a party defendant.

The court that removes a director may bar the director from reelection for a period prescribed by the court.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 504, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2227, § 85, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1414, § 49, effective July 1.

7-56-406. Indemnification and personal liability of directors, officers, employees, and agents.

Unless limited in the cooperative's articles, the cooperative shall have the same powers, rights, and obligations and shall be subject to the same limitations with respect to indemnification and personal liability of directors, officers, employees, and agents as apply to domestic corporations as set forth in article 109 of this title. Cooperative directors, officers, employees, and agents shall have the same rights as directors, officers, employees, and agents of domestic corporations as set forth in article 109 of this title. For purposes of this section, any reference to shareholders having the right to vote in article 109 of this title shall be construed to refer to members of the cooperative having the right to vote.

The articles may eliminate or limit the liability of a director of the cooperative to the cooperative or its members for monetary damages for any breach of the duty of care arising after the date the provision in the articles became effective, including the effective date of any provision adopted under a prior statute, except any acts or omissions in bad faith or that involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law; any transaction from which the director derived an improper personal benefit; any unlawful liquidating distributions of assets to members, unlawful loans to directors, or unlawful guarantees of loans to directors; unlawful dividends; unlawful stock or other equity repurchases; or any other unlawful distribution that was voted for or assented to if the director did not act in conformance with the standard of care as set forth in section 7-108-401.

No provision pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall eliminate or limit the liability of a director or officer to the cooperative or its members for monetary damages for any act or omission occurring prior to the date when such provision becomes effective.

A distribution of stock or other equity repurchase is unlawful if it renders the cooperative unable to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of business or, unless the articles permit otherwise, causes the assets to be less than the liabilities plus the amount necessary to satisfy the interests of the holders of securities or other equity capital preferential to those receiving the distribution, if dissolved at the time of the distribution.

No director or officer shall be personally liable for any tort committed by an employee unless the director or officer was personally involved.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, each director shall discharge the duties as a director, including duties as a member of a committee, in accordance with the provisions of section 7-108-401. Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, each officer with discretionary authority shall discharge such officer's duties under that authority in accordance with the provisions of section 7-108-401. For purposes of this subsection (2), references to "corporation" and "shareholders" in section 7-108-401 shall be construed as referring to "cooperative" and "members" respectively.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 504, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(2)(e) added, p. 612, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2227, § 86, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(2)(e) amended, p. 1414, § 50, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-107.5 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-407. Persons to be bonded.

At the discretion of the board of a cooperative, any officer, employee, or agent handling funds or negotiable instruments or property of or for the cooperative may be bonded for the faithful performance of the person's duties and obligations.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 505, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-115 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-408. Registered office and registered agent - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 505, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(2), (3)(a), and (4) amended, p. 1817, § 23, effective July 1; IP(2), (3)(a), and (4) amended, p. 1682, § 21, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(5) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

7-56-409. Registered agent - service of process.

Part 7 of article 90 of this title, providing for registered agents and service of process, applies to cooperatives formed under or subject to this article.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 2227, § 87, effective July 1, 2004.